Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.140

Statement of charges—Notice.

When a statement of charges is issued against a license holder or applicant under RCW 18.235.050, notice of this action must be given to the owner or qualified agent of the employing bail bond agency.

[ 2002 c 86 s 253; 1993 c 260 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.